Utah statutes.
63A-11-104.   Program -- Duties -- Contracting.

(1)  The department shall:

(a)  except as provided under Subsection (2), administer and enforce this chapter;

(b)  manage the operation and budget of the program; and

(c)  if the department operates the program as an internal service fund agency in accordance with Section 63A-1-109.5, submit to the Rate Committee established in Section 63A-1-114:

(i)  the proposed rate and fee schedule as required by Section 63A-1-114; and

(ii)  other information or analysis requested by the Rate Committee.

(2)  The department may contract with:

(a)  a qualified person to perform the program duties assigned by this chapter; and

(b)  an attorney authorized to practice law in the state, as an independent contractor, to serve as a parental defense attorney as provided under Section 63A-11-201.



Amended by Chapter 265, 2011 General Session

